Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-405] Maximum practicable
competition. (a) All specifications shall seek to promote overall
economy for the purposes intended and encourage competition in satisfying the
State's needs, and shall not be unduly restrictive.

(b) Specifications, to the extent practicable,
shall emphasize functional or performance criteria while limiting design or
other detailed physical descriptions to those necessary to meet the needs of
the State.

(c) The State shall procure standard
commercial products whenever practicable. In developing specifications,
accepted commercial standards shall be used and unique requirements shall be
avoided, to the extent practicable.

(d) Outside contractors may be utilized to
prepare specifications and work statements in the development of a
solicitation. Contractors paid for those services shall be precluded from
bidding on or receiving a contract when they participated in any way in the
development of the solicitation package or any resulting contract. [L Sp 1993,
c 8, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next